Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2067.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1.
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Feminine hygiene product grant program.......................................$200,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from the
feminine hygiene product grant program account to provide grant awards
each year to school districts that have a qualifying school and are
participating in the program pursuant to section 2, and amendments
thereto: Provided further, That the above agency shall distribute such grant
awards to participating school districts for distribution to qualifying
schools at the time or times determined by the state department of
education.
Sec. 2. (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Feminine hygiene products" means tampons, sanitary napkins,
panty liners and other similar tangible personal property designed for
feminine hygiene in connection with the human menstrual cycle.
(2) "Qualifying school" means a public school that receives funds
under title I of public law 874 and provides instruction in any of the grades
five through 12.
(b) (1) There is hereby established a grant program to award funds to
local boards of education of school districts to provide feminine hygiene
products to students enrolled in and attending a qualifying school at no
cost to such students. The program shall be implemented and administered
by the state department of education.
(2) Each local board of education of a school district that has a
qualifying school and intends to participate in the grant program shall
notify the state department of education of the school district's intention to

HB 2067 2
participate in the program.
(c) (1) Beginning in school year 2025-2026, the state department of
education shall certify on or before September 1 of each year the total
moneys available to be awarded under the program each school year and
shall allocate grant awards to the local board of education of a school
district for each qualifying school in such school district on a pro rata basis
based on the total number of female students enrolled in grades five
through 12 in each qualifying school of a school district.
(2) The state department of education shall accept grant applications
from school districts with qualifying schools. Upon submission of a valid
application, the state department of education shall reimburse each eligible
local board of education the actual cost of feminine hygiene products and
dispensers purchased by such local board of education for distribution at
each qualifying school. Such reimbursement shall not exceed the annual
grant allocation for such school.
(3) The state department of education shall annually notify each such
school districts of the amount of grant funds allocated to such school
district for each qualifying school in such school district.
(d) Any local board of education that accepts grant moneys under this
section shall:
(1) Make feminine hygiene products readily available at no cost to
female students in each women's restroom that is routinely utilized by
students in grades five through 12 and is located in a qualifying school;
and
(2) provide feminine hygiene products at no cost to female students in
grades five through 12 through a female school counselor, female school
nurse or female teacher selected by the principal of the qualifying school.
(e) Grants awarded pursuant to this section shall be subject to the
availability of funds. The legislature may appropriate funds to the state
department of education, and the state department of education may accept
moneys from nongovernmental entities for the purposes of this program.
(f) (1) There is hereby established in the state treasury the feminine
hygiene product grant fund. Such fund shall be administered by the state
department of education subject to the provisions of this section. All
moneys credited to such fund shall be used to provide grants for qualifying
schools to provide feminine hygiene products to students at no cost as
provided by this section. All expenditures from the feminine hygiene
product grant fund shall be made in accordance with the provisions of
appropriation acts upon warrants of the director of accounts and reports
issued pursuant to vouchers approved by the commissioner of education or
the commissioner's designee. Moneys not expended in any fiscal year shall
remain in the feminine hygiene product grant fund.
(2) On July 1, 2026, and each July 1 thereafter, or as soon after each

HB 2067 3
such date as moneys are available, the director of accounts and reports
shall transfer $200,000 from the state general fund to the feminine hygiene
product grant fund.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.